North Carolina, session 2025, HB656.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 7A-133 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-133. Numbers of judges by districts; numbers of magistrates and additional seats of
court, by counties.
(a) Each district court district shall have the numbers of judges as set forth in the
following table:

District Judges County
…
4343A 74 Cherokee
Clay
Graham
Haywood
Jackson
Macon
Swain.Swain
43B 4 Haywood
Jackson."
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the sum of two hundred fifty-three thousand one dollars ($253,001) in
recurring funds and ten thousand three hundred seventy-six dollars ($10,376) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to hire one full-time district court judge pursuant
to Section 1(a) of this act.
SECTION 1.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the sum of seven thousand four hundred twenty-one dollars ($7,421) in
recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be added to the salary of the district court judge
selected as chief district court judge of District 43B created under Section 1(a) of this act.
SECTION 1.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the sum of seventy-one thousand nine hundred thirty-two dollars ($71,932)
in recurring funds and three thousand four hundred thirty-six dollars ($3,436) in nonrecurring
*H656-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to hire one full-time judicial assistant to serve
District Court District 43B.
SECTION 1.(e) Subsection (a) of this section becomes effective January 1, 2027,
and elections held in 2026 shall be held accordingly. The remainder of this section becomes
effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 7A-498.7(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The following counties of the State are organized into the defender districts listed
below, and in each of those defender districts an office of public defender is established:

Defender District Counties
___________________________________________________________________
…
4343A Cherokee, Clay, Graham,
Haywood, Jackson, Macon,
Swain
43B Haywood, Jackson
After notice to, and consultation with, the affected district bar, senior resident superior court
judge, and chief district court judge, the Commission on Indigent Defense Services may
recommend to the General Assembly that a district or regional public defender office be
established. A legislative act is required in order to establish a new office or to abolish an existing
office."
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts, Office of Indigent Defense Services, the sum of two hundred twenty-eight
thousand four hundred sixty-one dollars ($228,461) in recurring funds and four thousand eight
hundred ninety-five dollars ($4,895) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be
used to hire one full-time chief public defender to serve Defender District 43B.
SECTION 2.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts, Office of Indigent Defense Services, the sum of four hundred twenty-four
thousand four hundred eighty-eight dollars ($424,488) in recurring funds and fourteen thousand
six hundred eighty-five dollars ($14,685) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
be used to hire three full-time assistant public defenders to serve Defender District 43B.
SECTION 2.(d) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 656-First Edition